California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
For the 1980–81 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, business inventories are exempt from taxation and the assessor shall not assess business inventories.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 411, Sec. 8.   Effective July 11, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 51 of Ch. 411.)
-------------------------------------------

220.

Any aircraft which is in California on the lien date solely for the purpose of being repaired, overhauled, modified, or serviced is exempt from personal property taxation. This exemption does not apply to aircraft normally based in California, or operated intrastate or interstate in and into California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

220.5.

(a) Aircraft of historical significance shall be exempt from taxation.

(b) The exemption provided in subdivision (a) applies only if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The assessee is an individual owner who does not hold the aircraft primarily for purposes of sale.

(2) The assessee does not use the aircraft for commercial purposes or
 general transportation.

(3) The aircraft is available for display to the public at least 12 days during the 12-month period immediately preceding the lien date for the year for which the exemption is claimed. If the aircraft was first made available for public display less than 12 days prior to the lien date, the exemption may be granted if the claimant certifies in writing that the aircraft will be made available for public display at least 12 days during the 12-month period commencing with the first day the property was made available for public display. When applying for an exemption pursuant to this section, the claimant shall attach to that application a certificate of attendance from the event coordinator of the event at which the aircraft was displayed as required by this paragraph.

(c) When claiming an exemption pursuant to this section, the claimant shall provide all
 information required and answer all questions contained in an affidavit furnished by the assessor. The claimant shall sign the affidavit, under penalty of perjury. The assessor may require additional proof of the information or answers provided in the affidavit before allowing the exemption.

(d) For purposes of this section, “aircraft of historical significance” means any aircraft that is an original, restored, or replica of a heavier than air powered aircraft that is 35 years or older or any aircraft of a type or model of which there are fewer than five in number known to exist worldwide.

(e) A fee of thirty-five dollars ($35) shall be charged and collected by the assessor upon the initial application for an exemption pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 200, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

221.

For the purposes of Section 214 a nursery school is any group facility for minors which has obtained a written license or permit to operate as such from the State Department of Social Services or from an inspection service approved or accredited by the State Department of Social Services, and which is owned and operated for one or more of the following purposes:

(a) The facility is owned and operated to provide day care for minors whose parent or parents are unable to supervise such minors due to the hours of employment of the parent or parents.

(b) The facility is owned and operated to provide training and education for minors of preschool age.

(c) The facility is owned and operated to provide instruction to parents on the subject of raising minors and to provide training and education for minors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1112.)
-------------------------------------------

222.

Personal property used exclusively in the operation of a zoo or for purposes of horticultural display on publicly owned land which is owned by a nonprofit zoological society meeting all the requirements of Section 214 shall be exempt from taxation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

222.5.

As used in Section 214, “property used exclusively for religious, hospital, scientific or charitable purposes” shall include possessory interests in publicly owned land, used exclusively for the operation of a zoo or for purposes of horticultural display by a zoological society meeting all the requirements of Section 214.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

223.

Fruit trees, nut trees, and grapevines of a grower, which are personal property, held on the lien date for subsequent planting in orchard or vineyard form and are planted during the assessment year by the grower shall be exempt from taxation. This section does not apply to plant nurseries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

224.

The personal effects, household furnishings, and pets of any person shall be exempt from taxation.

The phrase “personal effects, household furnishings, and pets” does not include boats, aircraft, vehicles, or personalty held or used in connection with a trade, profession or business or pets so held or used.

For purposes of this section, “pets” mean and include any animals held for noncommercial purposes and not as an investment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 311.)
-------------------------------------------

225.

(a) A trailer, semitrailer, logging dolly, pole or pipe dolly, or trailer bus, that has a valid identification plate issued to it pursuant to Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code, or any auxiliary dolly or tow dolly is exempt from personal property taxation.

(b) The exemption provided for in subdivision (a) does not apply to a logging dolly that is used exclusively off-highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 826, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

225.5.

(a) For purposes of Section 214 an educational television station is any facility, which does not accept advertising for a consideration and which transmits television programs by wires, lines, radio waves, waveguides, coaxial cable, microwave transmitters or other electronic or mechanical means or any combination thereof, if the corporation, fund or foundation owning such station receives at least twenty-five (25) percent of its operating expenses by means of contributions from the general public or dues from members.

(b) For purposes of Section 214 a noncommercial educational FM broadcast
 station is any facility licensed and operating pursuant to subpart (C) (commencing with Section 73.501) of Part 73 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 121.)
-------------------------------------------

226.

(a) Personal property consisting of qualified computer equipment shall be exempt from taxation.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified computer equipment” means all computer equipment of the San Diego Supercomputer Center located on the campus of the University of California, San Diego.

(2) “Computer equipment” includes, but is not limited to, any supercomputer and all peripheral computer and other equipment
 related to the system of which the supercomputer is the principal component and all other equipment that becomes a part of that supercomputer system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1559, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1988.   Applicable form July 1, 1988, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1559.)
-------------------------------------------

227.

A documented vessel, as defined in Section 130, shall be assessed at 4 percent of its full cash value only if the vessel is engaged or employed exclusively in any of the following:

(a) In the taking and possession of fish or other living resource of the sea for commercial purposes.

(b) In instruction or research studies as an oceanographic research vessel.

(c) In carrying or
 transporting seven or more people for hire for commercial passenger fishing purposes and holds a current certificate of inspection issued by the United States Coast Guard. A vessel shall not be deemed to be engaged or employed in activities other than the carrying or transporting of seven or more persons for hire for commercial passenger fishing purposes by reason of that vessel being used occasionally for dive, tour, or whale watching purposes. For purposes of this subdivision, “occasionally” means 15 percent or less of the total operating time logged for the immediately preceding assessment year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 647, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

228.

(a) A vessel with a market value of four hundred dollars ($400) or less shall be free from taxation. This section shall only apply to vessels used or held for noncommercial purposes and shall not apply to lifeboats or other vessels used in conjunction with operations of vessels with a market value of more than four hundred dollars ($400). This section shall not apply to more than one vessel owned, claimed, possessed, or controlled by an assessee on the lien date.

(b) For purposes of this section, “vessel” includes every description of watercraft
 used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water, except vessels described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 651 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, “vessel” includes all equipment, including mode of power, and furnishings that are normally required aboard the vessel during the accomplishment of the functions for which the vessel is being utilized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1281, Sec. 11.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

229.

(a) A floating home shall be assessed in the same manner as real property.

(b) For purposes of determining the valuation of floating homes pursuant to this section, the procedures set forth in Section 110.1 shall apply, except that: 

(1) The 1979 lien date shall be substituted for the 1975 lien date.

(2) The 1979–80 assessment roll shall be substituted for the 1975–76 assessment roll.

(3) The date January 1, 1983, shall be substituted for the dates June 30, 1980, and June 30, 1981.

(c) “Floating home” means a floating structure which is all of the following:

(1) It is designed and built to be used, or is modified to be used, as a stationary waterborne residential dwelling.

(2) It has no mode of power of its own.

(3) It is dependent for utilities upon a continuous utility linkage to a source originating on shore.

(4) It has a permanent continuous hookup to a shoreside sewage system.

“Floating home” does not include a vessel. This section does not affect existing law
 regarding residential use of tide and submerged lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1467, Sec. 36.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

230.

(a) With regard to taxes that attach as a lien on or after January 1, 2001, wooden vessels of historical significance, and all personal property thereon used in their operation, are exempt from taxation. This exemption applies if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The owner and operator is a nonprofit organization that has qualified for exemption under either Section 23701d of this code or under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) No part of the net earnings of the owner inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual.

(3) The vessel is used primarily as, or as a part of, a maritime museum that is regularly open to the public.

(4) Income from fundraising use and use for charter activities does not exceed 40 percent of operating revenues of the vessel, and all net earnings are used to further the exempt activity of the museum.

(b) When claiming an exemption pursuant to this section, a claiming organization shall give all information required and answer all questions in an affidavit, to be furnished by the assessor, that is signed by the claimant under penalty of perjury. The assessor may require other proof of the facts stated in the affidavit before allowing the
 exemption. A claimant for an exemption pursuant to this section is subject to Sections 255 and 260.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Wooden vessel of historical significance” means any wooden vessel that is a refurbished original, wooden inland waters vessel of 47 feet or larger, built in California during or prior to 1910, that continuously thereafter has remained in California waters, and that has been designated a California State Historical Landmark.

(2) “Regularly open to the public” means that the museum was open to the public not less than 20 hours per week for not less than 35 weeks of the 12-month period immediately preceding the lien date for the year for which the exemption is claimed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 601, Sec. 2.   Effective September 24, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

231.

(a) Property that is owned by a nonprofit corporation and leased to, and used exclusively by, government for its interest and benefit shall be exempt from taxation within the meaning of “charitable purposes” in subdivision (b) of Section 4 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution if:

(1) All of the provisions of Section 214 are complied with, except paragraph (6) of subdivision (a). For purposes of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 214, irrevocable
 dedication to charitable purpose shall be deemed to exist if the lease provides that the property shall be transferred in fee to the entity of government leasing the same upon the sooner of either the liquidation, dissolution, or abandonment of the owner or at the time the last rental payment is made under the provisions of the lease.

(2) All of the provisions of Section 254.5 relating to owners are complied with, commencing during calendar year 1969.

(3) All of the provisions of Section 214.01 are complied with by March 15, 1970.

(b) As used in this section “property” means:

(1) Any building or structure of a kind or nature which is uniquely of a governmental character and includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) City halls.

(B) Courthouses.

(C) Administration buildings.

(D) Police stations, jails, or detention facilities.

(E) Fire stations.

(F) Parks, playgrounds, or golf courses.

(G) Hospitals.

(H) Water systems and waste water facilities.

(I) Toll bridges.

(2) Any other property required for the use and occupation of the buildings and leased to government.

(3) Any possessory interest of the nonprofit corporation in property and in the land upon which the property was constructed and so much of the surrounding land that is required for the use and occupation of the property.

(4) Any building and its equipment in the course of construction on or after the first Monday of March, 1954, together with the land on which it is located as may be required for the use and occupation of the building when the building and equipment is being constructed for the sole purpose of being leased to government to lessen its burden.

“Uniquely of a governmental character” means the property, except hospitals, water systems, waste water facilities, golf courses, and toll bridges, is not intended to produce income or revenue in the form of rents or admission, user or service fees, or charges.

(c) As used in this section “property” does not include any possessory interest of any person or organization not exempt from taxation.

(d) As used in this section “nonprofit corporation” means a community chest, fund, foundation or corporation, not conducted for profit, and no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual and that nonprofit corporation is organized and operated for the sole purpose of leasing property to government and to lessen the burden of government and, in fact, only leases property to government. That nonprofit corporation shall qualify as an exempt organization either under Section 23701f or 23701u of this code or Section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. This subdivision is not intended to enlarge the “welfare exemption” to apply to organizations qualified under Section 501(c)(4) of the
 Internal Revenue Code of 1986 but not otherwise qualified for the “welfare exemption” under this section. Nonprofit corporations that meet the tests of this subdivision are deemed to be organized and operated for charitable purposes.

(e) As used in this section “government” means the State of California, a city, city and county, county, public corporation, and a hospital district.

(f) The exemption provided for in this section shall be deemed to be within the “welfare exemption” for purposes of Section 251.

(g) For leases first entered into by and between government and a nonprofit corporation on or after January 1, 1969, all requirements of this section shall be met for the property and the nonprofit corporation to qualify for the exemption provided by this section.

(h) For leases first entered into by and between government and a nonprofit corporation on or before December 31, 1968, all requirements of this section shall be met except that the last unnumbered paragraph of subdivision (b) shall not apply and for the purposes of subdivision (b)(1) the list of real property qualifying for this exemption includes community recreation buildings or facilities, golf courses, airports, water, sewer and drainage facilities, music centers and their related facilities, and public parking incidental to and in connection with one of the buildings or structures set forth in this section.

(i) Property exempt under this section shall be located within the boundaries of the entity of government leasing the same.

(j) Where the construction has commenced on or after January 1, 1969, improvements shall
 be advertised and put to competitive bid to qualify for the exemption provided by this section.

(k) For purposes of subdivision (d), a nonprofit corporation shall not be deemed to be qualified as an exempt organization unless the organization files with the assessor a valid organizational clearance certificate issued pursuant to Section 254.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 471, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

232.

All cargo containers principally used for the transportation of cargo by vessels in ocean commerce shall be exempt from property taxation.

Any tax exemption created by this section shall not apply to a cargo-carrying vehicle subject to the registration provisions of Section 4000 of the Vehicle Code.

The term “container” means a receptacle:

(a) Of a permanent character and accordingly strong enough to be suitable for repeated use;

(b) Specially designed to facilitate the carriage of goods, by one or more modes of transport, one of which shall be by vessels, without intermediate reloading;

(c) Fitted with devices permitting its ready handling, particularly its transfer from one mode of transport to another;

(d) So designed to be easy to fill and empty; and

(e) Having a cubic displacement of 1,000 cubic feet or more.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1405.   Note: Termination clause in Stats. 1979, Ch. 5, Sec. 3, was deleted by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

234.

Seed potatoes of a grower, which are personal property, held on the lien date for subsequent planting in field form and planted during the assessment year by the grower shall be exempt from taxation. This section does not apply to plant nurseries.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 232 (as added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 14) by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 398.)
-------------------------------------------

235.

For the purposes of this division, the lessee of tangible personal property owned by a bank or financial corporation shall be conclusively presumed the owner of that property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1457, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

236.

Property leased for a term of 35 years or more or any transfer of property leased with a remaining term of 35 years or more where the lessor is not otherwise qualified for a tax exemption pursuant to Section 214, which is used exclusively and solely for rental housing and related facilities for tenants who are persons of low income (as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code), and is leased and operated by religious, hospital, scientific, or charitable funds, foundations or corporations, public housing authorities, public agencies, or limited partnerships in which the managing general partner has received a determination that it is a charitable
 organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is operating the property in accordance with its exempt purpose is exempt from taxation on the possessory interest and the fee interest in the property throughout the term of the lease.

Low- and moderate-income has the same meaning as the term “persons and families of low- and moderate-income” as defined by Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1296, Sec. 1.   Applicable July 1, 1989, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1296.)
-------------------------------------------

236.5.

Any otherwise taxable interest in real property, leased for an original term of 35 years or more and used exclusively by the lessee for the operation of a public park that is uniquely of a governmental character, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 231, is, during the term of the lease, within the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 4 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The lessee is a
 charitable foundation that has received a determination that it is a charitable organization as described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) The operation of the public park by the lessee is within the tax exempt purposes of the lessee.

(c) The lessee acquired the leasehold in the property by means of a charitable donation.

(d) Under the terms of the lease, the lessee will acquire the entire ownership interest in the property on or before the end of the lease term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 609, Sec. 1.   Effective October 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

237.

(a) (1) Subject to the requirements set forth in paragraph (2), there is exempt from taxation under this part that portion of the assessed value of property, owned and operated by a federally recognized Indian tribe, its tribally designated housing entity, or, for a property that has received a reservation of low-income housing tax credits pursuant to Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, a limited partnership that includes a federally recognized Indian tribe or its tribally designated housing entity as the sole general partner, that corresponds to that portion of the property that is continuously available to, or occupied by, lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5
 of the Health and Safety Code or applicable federal, state, or local financing agreements, at rents that do not exceed those prescribed by Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code, or rents that do not exceed those prescribed by the terms of the applicable federal, state, or local financing agreements or financial assistance agreements.

(2) The exemption set forth in subdivision (a) applies only if the property and entity meet the following requirements:

(A) At least 30 percent of the property’s housing units are either continuously available to, or occupied by, lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code or applicable federal, state, or local financing agreements, at rents that do not exceed those prescribed by Section 50053 of the
 Health and Safety Code, or rents that do not exceed those prescribed by the terms of the applicable federal, state, or local financing agreements or financial assistance agreements.

(B) The tribally designated housing entity, if applicable, is nonprofit.

(C) No part of the net earnings of the housing entity inure to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual, except for a limited partner in a property that has received a reservation of low-income housing tax credits pursuant to Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(b) In lieu of the tax imposed by this part, a tribe or tribally designated housing entity may agree to make payments to a county, city, city and county, or political subdivision of the
 state for
 services, improvements, or facilities provided by that entity for the benefit of a low-income housing project owned and operated by the tribe or tribally designated housing entity. Any payments in lieu of tax may not exceed the estimated cost to the city, county, city and county, or political subdivision of the state of the services, improvements, or facilities to be provided.

(c) A tribe or tribally designated housing entity applying for an exemption under this section shall provide the following documents to the assessor:

(1) Documents establishing that the designating tribe is federally recognized.

(2) Documents establishing that the tribally designated housing entity, if applicable, has been
 designated by the tribe.

(3) Documents establishing that there is a deed restriction, agreement, or other legally binding document requiring that the property be used in compliance with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) This exemption shall be known as the “tribal housing exemption.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 498, Sec. 2.   (SB 1527)   Effective September 22, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

241.

(a) The first fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) of personal property that consists of hand tools owned and supplied by an employee that are required as a condition of that employee’s employment are exempt from taxation.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Hand tools” means hand-held implements and equipment, including hand-held power tools, of which any one may be transported to and from the workplace and which are
 necessary for the ordinary and regular performance of the employee’s work, and also means the appropriate storage containers used to store those implements and that equipment.

(2) “Hand tools owned and supplied by an employee” means only those hand tools that are either owned by the employee prior to the employment or acquired and paid for by the employee during the employment, that the employee will continue to own after termination of the employment.

(3) “Employee” means any individual who is employed by an employer that directly or indirectly supervises that person and exercises control over the wages and working conditions of individual workers. “Employee” does not include a self-employed individual or an independent contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 161, Sec. 1.   Effective August 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

242.

(a) There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this part qualified property for use in space flight.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified property” means any of the following:

(A) Tangible personal property, whether raw materials, work in process or finished goods, that has, or upon manufacture, assembly, or installation has, space flight capacity, including, but not limited to, an orbital space facility, space propulsion system, space vehicle, launch vehicle, satellite, or space station of any kind, and any component thereof, regardless of whether that property
 is to be ultimately returned to this state.

(B) Fuel of a quality that is not adaptable for use in ordinary motor vehicles, but is produced, sold, and used exclusively for space flight.

(2) “Space flight” means any flight designed for suborbital, orbital, or interplanetary travel by a space vehicle, satellite, space facility, or space station of any kind.

(c) The exemption established by this section shall not be denied by reason of failure, postponement, or cancellation of a launch of a space vehicle, satellite, space facility, or space station of any kind, or the destruction of any launch vehicle or any component thereof, but the exemption shall not apply to any material that is not intended to be launched into space.

(d) This section shall be operative from the January 1, 2014, lien date to, and including, the January 1, 2029, lien date, and is inoperative for any lien date thereafter.

(e) A taxpayer shall provide, upon request of the assessor, evidence that the qualified property exempted from the taxes imposed by this part pursuant to this section has been or will be used as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(f) The exemption provided by this section from the taxes imposed by this part shall be limited to taxpayers that have a primary business purpose in space flight activities.

(g) For purposes of complying with Section 41, with respect to
 the exemption set forth in this section, as amended by the act adding this subdivision (hereafter “the exemption”), the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The specific goal, purpose, and objective that the exemption will achieve includes increasing employment and investment in the space flight industry in California relative to other states with comparable infrastructure and capacity to support this industry.

(2) The detailed performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining whether the exemption meets the goal, purpose, and objective specified in paragraph (1) are:

(A) The change in the number of employees in the space flight industry in California resulting from the
 exemption.

(B) The change in the compensation amounts of employees in the space flight industry in California resulting from the exemption.

(C) The change in the amount of investment made in space flight facilities in California resulting from the exemption.

(3) (A) By January 1, 2028, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall provide to the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance, and the public a report that summarizes its findings regarding the performance indicators described in paragraph (2). The findings in the report shall be provided in an aggregated data format that anonymizes all information in the report. In researching the report, the Legislative
 Analyst’s Office may request and receive information from county assessors, the State Board of Equalization, taxpayers benefiting from the exemption, trade associations, or other individuals or entities. The Legislative
 Analyst’s Office may also request and receive information from the Employment Development Department in a nonconfidential form, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 1094 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(B) County assessors, the State Board of Equalization, the Employment Development Department, and taxpayers claiming the exemption shall provide information specified by the Legislative Analyst’s Office as needed to research the report required by this paragraph.

(C) Notwithstanding any law, records received by and in the custody of the Legislative Analyst’s Office in accordance with this subdivision shall be deemed confidential and shall not be subject to disclosure under the Legislative Open Records Act (Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 9070) of
 Chapter 1.5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 119.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative after the January 1, 2029, lien date, as provided in subd. (d).    Repealed as of July 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Procedure to Claim Exemptions [251. - 261.]

251.

(a) The board shall prescribe all procedures and forms required to carry into effect any property tax exemption enacted by statute or constitutional amendment.

(b) (1) The procedures prescribed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed satisfied by a qualified lessor by submission to the assessor within 120 days of the commencement date of the lease, or 120 days after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision to this section with respect to any existing lease, whichever is later, information which may be
 requested by the board with respect to the lease.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “a qualified lessor” is a lessor under a contract designated as a lease between that lessor and an entity using property which qualifies for the property tax exemption provided for by subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution under which the lessee has the option at the end of the lease term of acquiring the property described in the lease for one dollar ($1), or any other nominal sum.

(3) No filing or application for exemption shall thereafter be required by a qualified lessor with respect to that lease unless the option terms of the lease change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1271, Sec. 4.   Effective September 26, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

252.

When making the first claim any person claiming the veterans’ exemption, or the spouse, legal guardian, or conservator of such person, or one who has been granted a power of attorney by such person, shall appear before the assessor, shall give all information required and answer all questions in an affidavit prescribed by the State Board of Equalization, and shall subscribe and swear to the affidavit before the assessor. The assessor may require other proof of the facts stated before allowing the exemption. In subsequent years the person claiming the veterans’ exemption, or the spouse, legal guardian, or conservator of such person, or one who has been granted a power of
 attorney by such person, may file the affidavit under penalty of perjury by mail.

Where a claim is filed by a legal guardian or conservator of a person claiming the veterans’ exemption, or one who has been granted a power of attorney by such claimant, the person filing the affidavit shall declare that he has sufficient knowlege of the financial affairs of the claimant to give all information required and answer all questions in the affidavit under penalty of perjury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 143.)
-------------------------------------------

252.1.

Among other facts, the veterans’ exemption affidavit shall contain a statement, showing the claimant’s residence. When the affidavit is filed in a county other than the county of the claimant’s residence, it shall be filed in duplicate and the assessor shall transmit the duplicate copy to the assessor of the county of residence.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 255.5 by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

253.

If, because of active military service of the United States in time of war, sickness, or other cause found to be unavoidable in the judgment of the assessor, an applicant for the veterans’ exemption is unable to attend in person before the assessor, and a deputy is not available to go to the place where the applicant is located, then the applicant may make and subscribe the affidavit before any person authorized to administer an oath. If, during time of war, the applicant is in active military service of the United States or of any nation with which the
 United States is allied, or is outside of the continental limits of the United States, or if the person entitled to the exemption has a mental health disorder or lacks mental capacity, a member of the applicant’s immediate family or the applicant’s guardian or legal representative, having personal knowledge of the facts required to be set forth, may appear before the assessor and may make and subscribe the affidavit on the applicant’s behalf.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 19.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

253.5.

Any person claiming the homeowners’ property tax exemption shall submit to the assessor an affidavit, giving any information required by the board. Such information shall include, but shall not be limited to, the name of the person claiming the exemption, the address of the property, and a statement to the effect that the claimant owned and occupied the property as his principal place of residence on the lien date, or that he owns and intends to occupy the property as his principal place of residence on the next succeeding lien date.

A claim for the homeowners’ exemption filed by the owner of a dwelling, as defined in Section 218,
 once granted for the 1974–75 fiscal year or any fiscal year thereafter, shall remain in effect until such time as title to the property changes, the owner does not occupy the home as his principal place of residence on the lien date, or the property is otherwise ineligible pursuant to the provisions of Section 218.

If the exemption is lost by the owner of the property for any reason, he may file a new claim in the same manner as a new owner may file one.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

254.

Any person claiming the church, cemetery, college, exhibition, welfare, veterans’ organization, free public libraries, free museums, aircraft of historical significance, tribal housing, or public schools property tax exemption and anyone claiming the classification of a vessel as a documented vessel eligible for assessment under Section 227, shall submit to the assessor annually an affidavit, giving any information required by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

254.2.

All property owned by the United States or any agency thereof and used exclusively for migratory water fowl refuges, or used for the promotion or protection of migratory water fowl or for migratory water fowl public shooting grounds is exempt from taxation. No affidavit need be filed for this exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 666.)
-------------------------------------------

254.5.

(a) Claims for the welfare exemption and the veterans’ organization exemption shall be filed on or before February 15 of each year with the assessor.

The assessor may not approve a property tax exemption claim until the claimant has been issued a valid organizational clearance certificate pursuant to Section 254.6. Financial statements shall be submitted only if requested in writing by the assessor.

(b) (1) The assessor shall review all claims for the welfare exemption to ascertain whether the property on which the exemption is claimed meets the requirements of Section 214. The assessor shall also review all claims for the veterans’ organization exemption to ascertain whether the property on which the
 exemption is claimed meets the requirements of Section 215.1. In this connection, the assessor shall consider, among other matters, whether:

(A) Any capital investment of the owner or operator for expansion of a physical plant is justified by the contemplated return thereon, and required to serve the interests of the community.

(B) The property on which the exemption is claimed is used for the actual operation of an exempt activity and does not exceed an amount of property reasonably necessary to the accomplishment of the exempt purpose.
